Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB443.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 177.317 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Transportation Cabinet shall allow partial control of access on the Hal Rogers Parkway, between the
junction with Kentucky Route[KY] 192 and the junction with Kentucky Route[KY] 80, and establish
minimum spacing requirements and the manner in which the access is to be provided. Minimum access
spacing under this section shall be no less than one thousand two hundred (1,200) feet.
(2) The Transportation Cabinet shall include Kentucky Route 80 in the counties of Perry, Knott, and Floyd as
part of the Hal Rogers Parkway. The cabinet shall update:
(a) Online maps and databases upon the effective date of this Act; and
(b) Highway and directional signs upon the normal replacement schedule.
Signed by Governor March 24, 2025.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version